Washington statutes.
RCW 15.54.420

Unlawful acts.

It shall be unlawful for any person to:

(1) Distribute an adulterated or misbranded commercial fertilizer;

(2) Fail, refuse, or neglect to place upon or attach to each package of distributed commercial fertilizer a label containing all of the information required by this chapter;

(3) Fail, refuse, or neglect to deliver to a purchaser of bulk commercial fertilizer a statement containing the information required by this chapter;

(4) Distribute a commercial fertilizer product which has not been registered with the department;

(5) Distribute bulk fertilizer without holding a license to do so;

(6) Refuse or neglect to keep and maintain records, or to make reports when and as required; or

(7) Make false or fraudulent applications, records, invoices, or reports.

[ 1998 c 36 s 9; 1993 c 183 s 11; 1987 c 45 s 22; 1967 ex.s. c 22 s 30.]

NOTES:

Short title—1998 c 36: See note following RCW 15.54.265.

Construction—Severability—1987 c 45: See notes following RCW 15.54.270.